District of Columbia statutes.
42-2135

Information on affordable housing developments.

(a)

The Affordable Housing Inventory developed by the Mayor pursuant to § 42-2132 shall include the following information about any affordable housing development in the District of Columbia that is existing, planned, or under construction:

(1)

Name, address, and ward number;

(2)

Name and contact information of the owner;

(3)

Name and contact information of the property manager;

(4)

Name and contact information of the marketing manager;

(5)

Whether the affordable housing development is planned, under construction, or an existing property;

(6)

Name and contact information for the developer responsible for the construction of the affordable housing development;

(7)

Number of affordable housing units and number of market-rate units in the affordable housing development;

(8)

Number of affordable housing units by bedroom size;

(9)

Percentage of units that are accessible to persons with disabilities;

(10)

(A)

Type of financial assistance, funding, or subsidy provided by the District of Columbia or the federal government;

(B)

The name of the subsidy program;

(C)

The amount and the type of financial assistance provided with respect to the affordable housing development or unit;

(D)

Any income qualification and percentage of area median income restriction imposed by the program;

(E)

The date upon which the program commenced and the date upon which the program expires;

(F)

The start date and ending date of use restrictions (the earliest date upon which the affordable housing development can be sold without an affordable housing restriction);

(11)

Where available, for properties subsidized through the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development, all scores received through an inspection conducted by the Real Estate Assessment Center;

(12)

For properties that receive project-based funding under section 8 of the United States Housing Act of 1937, approved August 22, 1974 (88 Stat. 662; 42 U.S.C. § 1437f), an indication of whether the owner has issued a notice of termination of the assistance and the date of the notice;

(13)

For properties with a mortgage insured or held by the Secretary of the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development under sections 236(j)(1), 221(d)(3) BMIR, 241(f)/221-BMIR, or 241(f)/236 of the National Housing Act, approved June 27, 1934 (48 Stat. 1246; 12 U.S.C. § 1701 et seq.), an indication of whether the owner has issued a notice of prepayment of the mortgage and the date of such notice;

(14)

Any population specifically served by the affordable housing development, including elderly persons, persons with disabilities, and low-income individuals or families;

(15)

Any affordable units created under the inclusionary zoning requirements; and

(16)

All information required to be included in the Affordable Housing Locator pursuant to § 42-2136.

(b)

The Affordable Housing Inventory shall include a unique identification number for each affordable housing development.

Aug. 15, 2008, D.C. Law 17-215, § 6, 55 DCR 7494
This section is referenced in § 42-2133 and § 42-2134.